dev/verbs-apertium-kaz-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON V-PERS-COP

%+и%<cop%>: V-PERS-S3 ;

LEXICON CLIT-GENERAL    ! Includes personal copula suffixes, therefore appears only
                        ! after nominal parts of speech (and only after some cases).
                        ! FIXME: to be checked whether leads to any overgeneration
CLIT ;
V-PERS-COP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     NOMINAL INFLECTION (N-INFL-COMMON)

! The following combinations are possible:
!
! stem > case                                        : әти<nom> : әтине<acc>
!
! stem > poss-real > case                            : әтием<px1sg><nom> : әтиемне<px1sg><acc>
! stem > poss-real > ныкы/дагы/дай(*1)               : әтиемнеке/китабындагы,өегездәге/әтиемдәй
! stem > poss-real > ныкы/дагы > case                : Монда _эчеңдәгене_ тышка чыгарырга ярамый. (источник: musulman.su) 
! stem > poss-real > [ныкы]/дагы > poss-real > case  : _Эчендәгесе_(*3) – тышында, диләр андый кешеләр турында. (источник: beznen.ru)
!
! stem > ныкы/дагы/дай                               : әтинеке/әтидәге/әтидәй
! stem > ныкы/дагы(*2) > case                        : Бу соңгы _еллардагының_ өчтән икесе чамасы.
!
! stem > сыз(abe)                  WORKS
! stem > сыз(abe) > case           DOESN'T WORK YET
! stem > сыз(abe) > poss > case    (?)
!
! *1. "ныкы" form in some Tatar grammars is called "predicative genitive".
!     Indeed, when not substantivized, it has predicative use:
!     "Бу яулык әнинеке." (vs "Әнинең яулыгы.")
! *2. "дай" is considered to be an adverbializer, so no case endings after it (=no <subst> reading).
! *3. This doesn't work atm (it's recursive), but it doesn't seem to be very frequent also;
!     Most likely it is restricted to px3sp.
!------------------------------------------- 

LEXICON CASE-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}ң CLIT ;      ! -ның/-нең
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;   ! -га/-гә, -ка/-кә    ! -а/-ә in nouns with possessives in singular (see below)
%<acc%>:%>н%{I%} CLIT ;       ! -ны/-не

LEXICON CASE

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;               ! - - -
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT-GENERAL ;  ! -дан/-дән, -тан/-тән, -нан/нән
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   ! -да/-дә, -та/-тә

LEXICON CASE-2  ! The difference from CASE is that CASE-2 doesn't continue
                ! with personal copula suffixes. Atm used only for <abe>
                ! thing /02082012, IS/

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLIT ;               ! - - -
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT ;  ! -дан/-дән, -тан/-тән, -нан/нән
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT ;   ! -да/-дә, -та/-тә

LEXICON ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

! <abe> thing doesn't take personal copula suffixes (JNW, please correct me),
! so SUBST reading of it is linked to CASE-2, not CASE.
! A counterexample could be e.g. "бәхет-сез-мен", but that's only because "бәхетсез"
! has lexicalized as an adjective.

! Note that allowing of the (scarcely existing) [X +<abe> +<pers.cop> (+ modalpcle)] sequence
! would require some additional rules in kaz-tat.t2x /02082012, IS/

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<advl%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

!%<abe%>:%>с%{I%}з ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;
%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASE ;        ! -ныкы/-неке
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} ATTR/SUBST ;  ! -дагы/-дәге, -тагы/-тәге ! <s>FIXME:NOTE: I am in favour for changing the tag to loc2
                                                                    ! ("DAGI"=loc2 and not "DAGI"=loc"DA"+attr"GI") But first
                                                                    ! I'll give some arguments in a mail to apertium-turkic</s>
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;             ! -дай/-дәй, -тай/-тәй     ! FIXME:CHECK:In Tatar this is considered to be an adverbializer, so
                                                                    ! no case endings after it. In Kazakh it should be the same /I.S./
LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE-ETC ;                 ! -ым/-ем, -м
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE-ETC ;                 ! -ың/-ең, -ң
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;        ! -ы/е, -сы/-се
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;           ! -ыбыз/-ебез, -быз/-без
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;           ! -ыгыз/-егез, -гыз/-гез

! Again, there is only one formal form in Tatar (which could be tagged
! as <sp><frm>), but having it duplicated as sg/pl seems to make
! translating into Kazakh easier (leaving room to disambiguate it
! somehow in CG) /I.S./

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;

!CASE-ETC ; ! FIXME:NOTE:! this was temporarily put here because some gerunds and pronouns are linked
                        ! to POSS-REAL. They should be linked to SUBST actually (and they will) /I.S./ 

! In dative nouns with <px1sg> <px2sg> and <px3sp> gets an "-a" ending instead of "-га/-гә, -ка/-кә"
! In nouns with <px3sp> there is an enclitic "н" in most cases
!! китабым      китабың	        китабы
!! китабымның   китабыңның      китабының
!! китабыма!    китабыңа!       китабы-н-а!
!! китабымны    китабыңны       китабы-н      ! китабы-н-ы is an old form. Only in poetry :)
!! китабымнан   китабыңнан      китабы-н-нан
!! китабымда    китабыңда       китабы-н-да

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;
ABE-ETC ; ! FIXME check whether this is possible after adjectives and other
          ! subst. things.
          ! Maybe a better idea is to restrict it to nouns and pronouns.
          ! Actually, not all pronouns take it. "Синсез" vs "*үземсез".
          ! Be careful :) /IS to himself/

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION (for verbal adjectives A2 should be used)
!                                                               <s>(a separate ADJ-COMMON might be even better, see kaz.lexc)</s>
! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! e.g. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of ADJ-LEVELS class

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;
CLIT ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivized and andverbialized;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# яхшы, тиз

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# яхшы кеше
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;                  !# яхшырак эш

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "Яхшы яхшыны тудыра." 
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;        !# яхшыракны таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# "Тиз янган тиз сүнгән."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;          !# "Бәла бәхеттән тизрәк йөри."

LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalized) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# иске

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# иске дус
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;                  !# искерәк версия

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "Яңа булды дип, искене ташлама."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;        !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."
 

 LEXICON Adjectives
аксыл:аксыл A2 ; ! ""
ачы:ачы A2 ; ! ""
ашыгыч:ашыгыч A2 ; ! ""
бәйсез:бәйсез A2 ; ! ""
бәяле:бәяле A2 ; ! ""
билгеле:билгеле A2 ; ! ""
әүвәлге:әүвәлге A2 ; ! ""
әһәмиятле:әһәмиятле A2 ; ! ""
җитди:җитди A2 ; ! ""
катгый:катгый A2 ; ! ""
катлаулы:катлаулы A2 ; ! ""
кече:кече A2 ; ! ""
күптәнге:күптәнге A2 ; ! ""
кызгылт:кызгылт A2 ; ! ""
кыйммәтле:кыйммәтле A2 ; ! ""
лаек:лаек A2 ; ! ""
мөһим:мөһим A2 ; ! ""
охшаш:охшаш A2 ; ! ""
сазламык:сазламык A2 ; ! ""
соңгы:соңгы A2 ; ! ""
тантаналы:тантаналы A2 ; ! ""
тартым:тартым A2 ; ! ""
тиешле:тиешле A2 ; ! ""
төсле:төсле A2 ; ! ""
түгәрәк:түгәрәк A2 ; ! "round, circular"
түземле:түземле A2 ; ! ""
уртача:уртача A2 ; ! ""
үләнчел:үләнчел A2 ; ! ""
хәзерге:хәзерге A2 ; ! ""
хәл% иткеч:хәл% иткеч A2 ; ! "" Use/MT
чыдам:чыдам A2 ; ! ""
элекке:элекке A2 ; ! ""
юеш:юеш A2 ; ! ""
авыр:авыр A1 ; ! ""
аграр:аграр A1 ; ! ""
административ:административ A1 ; ! ""
аз:аз A1 ; ! ""
азат:азат A1 ; ! ""
акрын:акрын A1 ; ! ""
актуаль:актуаль A1 ; ! ""
акылсыз:акылсыз A1 ; ! ""
ала:ала A1 ; ! ""
аллы:аллы A1 ; ! ""
аналитик:аналитик A1 ; ! ""
анык:анык A1 ; ! ""
арзан:арзан A1 ; ! ""
артык:артык A1 ; ! ""
ары% табангы:ары% табангы A1 ; ! ""
атналык:атналык A1 ; ! ""
ачык:ачык A1 ; ! ""
аязлы:аязлы A1 ; ! ""
бай:бай A1 ; ! ""
балигъ:балигъ A1 ; ! ""
башкарма:башкарма A1 ; ! ""
бердәнбер:бердәнбер A1 ; ! ""
биек:биек A1 ; ! ""
билгесез:билгесез A1 ; ! ""
бозык:бозык A1 ; ! ""
борынгы:борынгы A1 ; ! ""
бурычлы:бурычлы A1 ; ! ""
бушлай:бушлай A1 ; ! ""
былтыргы:былтыргы A1 ; ! ""
бәләкәй:бәләкәй A1 ; ! ""
бәхетсез:бәхетсез A1 ; ! ""
бөтен:бөтен A1 ; ! ""
вакытлыча:вакытлыча A1 ; ! ""
гади:гади A1 ; ! ""
гаепле:гаепле A1 ; ! ""
гамәли:гамәли A1 ; ! ""
гаҗәп:гаҗәп A1 ; ! ""
горур:горур A1 ; ! ""
гүзәл:гүзәл A1 ; ! ""
демократик:демократик A1 ; ! "democratic"
дымлы:дымлы A1 ; ! ""
дәүләти:дәүләти A1 ; ! ""
ерак:ерак A1 ; ! ""
заманча:заманча A1 ; ! ""
зур:зур A1 ; ! ""
игътибарлы:игътибарлы A1 ; ! ""
икътисади:икътисади A1 ; ! ""
имин:имин A1 ; ! ""
ирексездән% эшләнгән:ирексездән% эшләнгән A1 ; ! ""
иртәнге:иртәнге A1 ; ! ""
исерек:исерек A1 ; ! ""
искиткеч:искиткеч A1 ; ! ""
искитәрлек:искитәрлек A1 ; ! ""
исән:исән A1 ; ! ""
иҗади:иҗади A1 ; ! ""
иңле:иңле A1 ; ! ""
йомшак:йомшак A1 ; ! ""
кадерле:кадерле A1 ; ! ""
кайгылы:кайгылы A1 ; ! ""
калын:калын A1 ; ! ""
капиталь:капиталь A1 ; ! ""
караңгы:караңгы A1 ; ! ""
каршы:каршы A1 ; ! ""
керле:керле A1 ; ! "dirty"
кечкенә:кечкенә A1 ; ! ""
ким:ким A1 ; ! ""
кирәк:кирәк A1 ; ! ""
кискен:кискен A1 ; ! ""
кодрәтле:кодрәтле A1 ; ! ""
конкрет:конкрет A1 ; ! ""
коточарлык:коточарлык A1 ; ! ""
кояшлы:кояшлы A1 ; ! ""
кулай:кулай A1 ; ! ""
куркыныч:куркыныч A1 ; ! ""
кыен:кыен A1 ; ! ""
кызу:кызу A1 ; ! ""
кызып% китүчән:кызып% китүчән A1 ; ! ""
кырыс:кырыс A1 ; ! ""
күренмәле:күренмәле A1 ; ! ""
күңелле:күңелле A1 ; ! ""
көрән:көрән A1 ; ! "light brown"
максатлы:максатлы A1 ; ! ""
мескен:мескен A1 ; ! ""
мохтаҗ:мохтаҗ A1 ; ! ""
мәшгуль:мәшгуль A1 ; ! ""
надан:надан A1 ; ! ""
нечкә:нечкә A1 ; ! ""
нык:нык A1 ; ! ""
нәфис:нәфис A1 ; ! ""
озынча:озынча A1 ; ! ""
пленар:пленар A1 ; ! ""
реаль:реаль A1 ; ! ""
рәхимле:рәхимле A1 ; ! ""
сау:сау A1 ; ! ""
сирәк:сирәк A1 ; ! ""
соң:соң A1 ; ! ""
суык:суык A1 ; ! ""
сәламәт:сәламәт A1 ; ! ""
сөйкемле:сөйкемле A1 ; ! ""
тапкыр:тапкыр A1 ; ! ""
тематик:тематик A1 ; ! ""
тиз:тиз A1 ; ! ""
тонык:тонык A1 ; ! ""
туп-туры:туп-туры A1 ; ! ""
тыгыз:тыгыз A1 ; ! ""
тышкы:тышкы A1 ; ! ""
тәмле:тәмле A1 ; ! ""
төгәл:төгәл A1 ; ! ""
төрки:төрки A1 ; ! ""
унитар:унитар A1 ; ! ""
усал:усал A1 ; ! ""
физик:физик A1 ; ! ""
хас:хас A1 ; ! ""
хосусый:хосусый A1 ; ! ""
хәтсез:хәтсез A1 ; ! ""
чибәр:чибәр A1 ; ! ""
чит:чит A1 ; ! ""
шат:шат A1 ; ! ""
шәркый:шәркый A1 ; ! ""
ышанычлы:ышанычлы A1 ; ! ""
эссе:эссе A1 ; ! ""
юка:юка A1 ; ! ""
ягымлы:ягымлы A1 ; ! ""
ялгаулы:ялгаулы A1 ; ! ""
яп-якты:яп-якты A1 ; ! ""
ярык:ярык A1 ; ! ""
яшерен:яшерен A1 ; ! ""
җай:җай A1 ; ! ""
җирле:җирле A1 ; ! ""
җыелма:җыелма A1 ; ! ""
үзара:үзара A1 ; ! ""
үлек:үлек A1 ; ! ""
әдәпсез:әдәпсез A1 ; ! ""
әхлакый:әхлакый A1 ; ! ""
өлкән:өлкән A1 ; ! ""
атып% алынган:атып% алынган A1 ; ! ""
балаларныкы:балаларныкы A1 ; ! ""
белмәгән:белмәгән A1 ; ! ""
бик% яхшы:бик% яхшы A1 ; ! ""
гарби:гарби A1 ; ! ""
елтырап% торган:елтырап% торган A1 ; ! ""
зур% түгел:зур% түгел A1 ; ! ""
көнчыгыш:көнчыгыш A1 ; ! ""
менә% дигән:менә% дигән A1 ; ! ""
сугыш:сугыш A1 ; ! ""
таш:таш A1 ; ! ""
чираттагы:чираттагы A1 ; ! ""
яраткан:яраткан A1 ; ! ""
җәмәгать:җәмәгать A1 ; ! ""
